North Dakota, session 69, HB1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 44-08-25 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
44-08-25. Prohibition - Sanctuary - Immigration - Void - Fund - Continuing appropriation.
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state, a political subdivision, or institution of
higher education under the supervision of the state board of higher education or any agent or
employee of the state, a political subdivision, or the institution of higher education may not
adopt or implement, whether formally or informally, a sanctuary policy, including a policy,
order, or ordinance that:
a. Limits or prohibits an individual from communicating or cooperating with federal agencies
or officials to verify or report the immigration status of an individual; or
b. Grants a noncitizen unlawfully present in the United States the right to lawful presence or
status within the state, a political subdivision, or the institution of higher education;
c. Violates a provision of chapter 1373 of United States Code title 8 [8 U.S.C. 1373] ;
d. Restricts or imposes a condition upon the cooperation or compliance of a state agency,
department, or office or political subdivision with United States immigration and customs
enforcement to maintain custody of or to transfer an illegal alien to the custody of United
States immigration and customs enforcement; or
e. Prevents a law enforcement officer of a political subdivision from asking an individual in
custody the individual's citizenship or immigration status.
2. The attorney general, upon receiving a complaint from an individual regarding a violation of
this section, may investigate as necessary. If the attorney general finds a political subdivision
is in violation of this section, the attorney general shall issue an opinion to the political
subdivision, including findings of fact describing with specificity the sanctuary policy.
3. Within thirty days of receiving an opinion under subsection 2, a political subdivision may
appeal the opinion to the district court or provide the attorney general with evidence to
demonstrate a sanctuary policy is no longer in effect.
4. If a political subdivision provides the attorney general with sufficient evidence to demonstrate
a sanctuary policy is no longer in effect, the attorney general shall:
a. Issue a second opinion to the political subdivision declaring the political subdivision no
longer has a sanctuary policy; and
b. If applicable, direct the state treasurer to cease withholding the political subdivision's
funding under subsection 5 .

H. B. NO. 1303 - PAGE 2
5. Within thirty days after the political subdivision receives an opinion under subsection 2, the
attorney general shall direct the state treasurer to withhold the political subdivision's allocation
from the state aid distribution fund under section 57 - 39.2 - 26.1 and deposit the withheld funds
into the sanctuary compliance fund. Funds will be distributed to the political subdivision upon
compliance with this section as determined by the attorney general.
6. There is created a special fund in the state treasury called the sanctuary compliance fund. The
fund consists of all moneys deposited under this section. Moneys in the fund are appropriated
on a continuing basis to the state treasurer and may be distributed back to the political
subdivision upon compliance with this section, or to political subdivisions that are in
compliance with this section, using existing formulas or distribution methods.
7. Any policy, order, or ordinance adopted in violation of this section is void.

H. B. NO. 1303 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1303.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 11 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 5 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State